Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Article 3. Southwest Mississippi Area Workforce Training Project [Repealed].

§§ 57-107-101 through 57-107-107.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2009, ch. 471, § 9, as amended by Laws, 2011, ch. 480, § 39, effective from and after July 1, 2011.

§57-107-101. [Laws, 2009, ch. 471, 5, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 30, 2009.)]

§57-107-103. [Laws, 2009, ch. 471, 6, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 30, 2009.)]

§57-107-105. [Laws, 2009, ch. 471, 7, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 30, 2009.)]

§57-107-107. [Laws, 2009, ch. 471, 8, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 30, 2009.)]